Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-100.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Board or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 63.2-101.
Authority of Department to request and receive information from other agencies; use of information so obtained; provide access to information for medical assistance eligibility purposes.

The Department may request and shall receive from the records of all departments, boards, bureaus or other agencies of this Commonwealth and of other states such information as is necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions and programs of this title, and the same are authorized to provide such information; provided that, a written statement from the requesting party stating the reason for seeking such record is submitted and filed with the record sought. The Department may make such information available only to public officials and agencies of this Commonwealth, and other states, and political subdivisions of this Commonwealth and other states, where the request for information relates to administration of the various public assistance or social services programs.

The Department shall provide, to the Department of Medical Assistance Services and to certain entities approved by the Board of Medical Assistance Services, access to information regarding a medical assistance applicant’s receipt of public assistance from programs administered by the Department. Such access shall be limited to information necessary to determine an individual’s eligibility for medical assistance services and to the extent specified in a memorandum of understanding between the Department and the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

History.

1975, c. 9, § 63.1-1.1:1; 1981, c. 21; 2002, c. 747; 2016, c. 111.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 111 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 63.2-102.
Allowing access to records and information for public assistance programs and child support enforcement; penalty.

All records, information and statistical registries of the Department and local boards and other information that pertain to public assistance and child support enforcement provided to or on behalf of any individual shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to persons specified hereinafter and to the extent permitted by state and federal law and regulation. The local boards shall allow the Commissioner, at all times, to have access to the records of the local boards relating to the appropriation, expenditure and distribution of funds for, and other matters concerning, public assistance under this title.Except as provided by state and federal law and regulation, no record, information or statistical registries concerning applicants for and recipients of public assistance and child support shall be made available except for purposes directly connected with the administration of such programs. Such purposes include establishing eligibility, determining the amount of the public assistance and child support, and providing social services for applicants and recipients. It shall be unlawful for any person to disclose, directly or indirectly, any such confidential information, and any person violating these provisions shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If a request for a record or information concerning applicants for and recipients of public assistance or child support is made to the Department or a local department for a purpose not directly connected to the administration of such programs, the Commissioner or local director shall not provide the record or information unless permitted by state or federal law or regulation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-41, 63-68, 63-140, 63-140.15, 63-161, 63-204, 63-220; 1952, c. 287; 1962, c. 621; 1968, cc. 43, 466, 578, §§ 63.1-34, 63.1-53, 63.1-126; 1970, c. 233; 1972, c. 718; 1974, c. 417; 1975, c. 311; 1984, c. 498; 1986, c. 594; 1988, c. 906; 1996, c. 455; 2001, c. 518; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to exchange of information among parties in accordance with argeements developed by hospital and community-based multi-disciplinary teams created to assist in identifying abused and neglected children, coordinating services for them, etc., see §

63.2-1503

J.

As to exemptions from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Law Review.

For article, “Welfare Reform and Local Administration of Aid to Families with Dependent Children in Virginia,” see 57 Va. L. Rev. 818 (1971).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 9 Discovery. § 9.04 Privileges against discovery. Bryson.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Confidentiality of agency records. —

Because a husband was requesting confidential information from a county agency to help calculate the proper amount of child support payments, the confidentiality of the agency’s records was tantamount; therefore, the agency’s motion to quash the husband’s subpoena duces tecum was granted. Tyson v. Tyson, 69 Va. Cir. 92, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 213 (Fairfax County Sept. 19, 2005).

§ 63.2-103.
Confidential records and information concerning child support enforcement.

Any records established pursuant to the provisions of §

63.2-1902

shall be available only for the enforcement of support of children and their caretakers and to the Attorney General, prosecuting attorneys, law-enforcement agencies, courts of competent jurisdiction and agencies in other states engaged in the enforcement of support of children and their caretakers. Information pertaining to actions taken on behalf of recipients of child support services may be disclosed to the recipient and other parties pursuant to Board regulations. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the release of information to parties involved in administrative proceedings pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of this title, taking into account the health and safety of the parties to whom the information is related, and such releases of information shall be permitted, notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act (§

2.2-3800

et seq.). Information may also be disclosed to authorized persons, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 663, in cases of unlawful taking or restraint of a child.

History.

1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.6; 1990, c. 836; 1991, cc. 545, 588; 1994, c. 665; 1997, cc. 796, 895; 2001, c. 573; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-104.
Confidential records and information concerning social services; penalty.

The records, information and statistical registries of the Department, local departments and of all child-welfare agencies concerning social services to or on behalf of individuals shall be confidential information, provided that the Commissioner, the Board and their agents shall have access to such records, information and statistical registries, and that such records, information and statistical registries may be disclosed to any person having a legitimate interest in accordance with state and federal law and regulation.

A person having a legitimate interest in child-protective services records and records involving a child receiving foster care services as defined in § 16.1-228 includes the staff of (i) a court services unit, (ii) the Department of Juvenile Justice, (iii) a local community services board, or (iv) the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services who are providing treatment, services, or care for a child who is the subject of such records for a purpose relevant to the provision of the treatment, services, or care when the local agencies have entered into a formal agreement with the Department of Juvenile Justice to provide coordinated services to such children. Such formal agreements may allow the local agencies and the Department of Juvenile Justice to immediately identify children who may be receiving or who have received treatment, services, or care from the local agencies and the Department of Juvenile Justice. Any court services unit or local community services board to which such records are disclosed in accordance with this paragraph shall not further disclose any information received unless such further disclosure is expressly required by law.

The model memorandum of understanding developed in accordance with §

66-10.3

may serve as the formal agreement that is required pursuant to this subsection, but any formal agreement that is entered into by the local agencies and the Department of Juvenile Justice shall be reviewed by the Office of the Attorney General before such agreement may take effect.

It is unlawful for any officer, agent or employee of any child-welfare agency; for the Commissioner, the State Board or their agents or employees; for any person who has held any such position; and for any other person to whom any such record or information is disclosed to disclose, directly or indirectly, any such confidential record or information, except as herein provided or pursuant to §

63.2-105

. Every violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If a request for a record or information concerning applicants for and recipients of social services is made to the Department or a local department by a person who does not have a legitimate interest, the Commissioner or local director shall not provide the record or information unless permitted by state or federal law or regulation.

This section shall not apply to the disposition of adoption records, reports and information that is governed by the provisions of §

63.2-1246

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-41, 63-140, 63-140.15, 63-161, 63-204, 63-220, 63-246; 1958, c. 433; 1962, c. 621; 1968, cc. 43, 578, §§ 63.1-34, 63.1-126, 63.1-209; 1972, c. 540; 1976, c. 365; 1977, c. 547, § 63.1-55.4; 1979, cc. 218, 666; 1981, c. 456; 1983, c. 604; 1986, c. 213; 1988, cc. 151, 898; 1994, c. 643; 2000, cc. 500, 830; 2001, cc. 503, 518; 2002, c. 747; 2022, cc. 63, 64.

Cross references.

As to exchange of information among parties in accordance with argeements developed by hospital and community-based multi-disciplinary teams created to assist in identifying abused and neglected children, coordinating services for them, etc., see §

63.2-1503

J.

As to exclusion of reports and documentary evidence from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 63 and 64 are identical, and in subsection A, added the second and third paragraphs and substituted “It is” for “It shall be” in the fourth paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976).

for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Request of agency records to calculate child support not allowed. —

Because a husband was requesting confidential information from a county agency to help calculate the proper amount of child support payments, the confidentiality of the agency’s records was tantamount; therefore, the agency’s motion to quash the husband’s subpoena duces tecum was granted. Tyson v. Tyson, 69 Va. Cir. 92, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 213 (Fairfax County Sept. 19, 2005).

Materiality of information. —

In a case in which the Commonwealth’s Attorney and the Department of Social Services jointly requested the court to quash a subpoena duces tecum filed by defendant, the court ruled that defendant’s right to discover exculpatory evidence did not include unsupervised authority to search through the Commonwealth’s files and make determination as to materiality of information. Commonwealth v. Demchuck, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 455 (Culpeper County Dec. 6, 2021).

Subpoena duces tecum for Department of Family Services records to mitigate punishment quashed. —

When defendant had a subpoena duces tecum issued for records of the Department of Family Services regarding abuse or neglect of defendant or defendant’s siblings as mitigating evidence should defendant be convicted of pending criminal charges, the subpoena was quashed because (1) the Department had a duty, under §

63.2-104

, to keep the records confidential, and (2) defendant’s request did not outweigh this duty, as the duty protected defendant’s minor siblings, and defendant could not claim a legitimate interest in the records simply because the records might assist defendant in defendant’s criminal case. Commonwealth v. Williams, 84 Va. Cir. 325, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 20 (Fairfax County Feb. 22, 2012).

When defendant had a subpoena duces tecum issued for records of the Department of Family Services regarding abuse or neglect of defendant or defendant’s siblings as mitigating evidence should defendant be convicted of pending criminal charges, the subpoena was quashed because (1) defendant improperly requested the subpoena’s issuance to obtain
Brady
material under Va. Sup. Ct. R. 3A:12, and (2) the Department had a compelling interest in protecting the confidentiality of information concerning social services to or on behalf of the individuals it served. Commonwealth v. Williams, 84 Va. Cir. 325, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 20 (Fairfax County Feb. 22, 2012).

Subpoena duces tecum request for forensic interview records. —

Parent was not entitled to disclosure of a forensic interview conducted with a juvenile that formed the basis of an ex parte preliminary protective order issued by a court because the disclosure was not in the child’s best interest due to the sensitive nature of the questions and answers and the need to preserve confidentiality. The parent’s argument that the issuance of a protective order prohibited the parent from possession of a firearm in violation of U.S. Const. amend. II did not outweigh the child’s best interest. Patton v. Patton, 108 Va. Cir. 175, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 126 (Culpeper County June 2, 2021).

Subpoena granted in part and denied in part. —

Department of Social Services (DSS) was allowed to quash a portion of defendant’s subpoena duces tecum requesting all its records pertaining to the Child Protective Services (CPS) investigation of the alleged victims in the case because, while defendant was not entitled to disclosure of confidential records and information and was barred from access to social services records until a final disposition in the criminal proceeding, he was entitled to certain information under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act and the constitution pursuant to a protective order that would assure to the extent possible the confidentiality of CPS records and limit dissemination of that information to its proper use in the defense of the case. Commonwealth v. DiRosario, 100 Va. Cir. 441, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3068 (Westmoreland County June 26, 2007).

§ 63.2-104.1.
Confidentiality of records of persons receiving domestic and sexual violence services.

In order to ensure the safety of adult and child victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or victims of a violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

, and their families, programs and individuals providing services to such victims shall protect the confidentiality and privacy of persons receiving services.

Except as provided in subsections C and D, programs and individuals providing services to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or victims of a violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

, shall not:

Disclose any personally identifying information or individual information collected in connection with services requested, utilized, or denied through programs for victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or victims of a violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

; or

Reveal individual client information without the informed, written, reasonably time-limited consent of the person about whom information is sought; the minor and his parent or legal guardian, in cases in which the client is an unemancipated minor; or the guardian of an incapacitated person as defined in §

64.2-2000

, whether for this program or any other Federal, State, tribal, or territorial grant program. However, consent for release may not be given by the abuser or alleged abuser of the minor or incapacitated person, or the abuser or alleged abuser of the other parent of the minor.

If release of information described in subsection B is compelled by statutory or court mandate, the program or individual providing services shall:

Make reasonable attempts to provide notice to victims affected by the disclosure of information; and

Take steps necessary to protect the privacy and safety of the persons affected by the release of the information.

Programs and individuals providing services to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or victims of a violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

, may share:

Nonpersonally identifying data in the aggregate regarding services to their clients and nonpersonally identifying demographic information in order to comply with Federal, State, tribal, or territorial reporting, evaluation, or data collection requirements;

Court generated information and law-enforcement generated information contained in secure, governmental registries for protection order enforcement purposes; and

Information necessary for law enforcement and prosecution purposes.For purposes of this section, “programs” shall include public and not-for-profit agencies the primary mission of which is to provide services to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or victims of a violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

.

For the purposes of this section, a person may be a victim of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or a victim of a violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

, regardless of whether any person has been charged with or convicted of any offense.

History.

2006, c. 135; 2016, cc. 666, 670.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “37.2-1000” was changed to “64.2-2000” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 666 and 670 are identical and rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Subpoena duces tecum request for forensic interview records. —

Parent was not entitled to disclosure of a forensic interview conducted with a juvenile that formed the basis of an ex parte preliminary protective order issued by a court because the disclosure was not in the child’s best interest due to the sensitive nature of the questions and answers and the need to preserve confidentiality. The parent’s argument that the issuance of a protective order prohibited the parent from possession of a firearm in violation of U.S. Const. amend. II did not outweigh the child’s best interest. Patton v. Patton, 108 Va. Cir. 175, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 126 (Culpeper County June 2, 2021).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reports of suspected child abuse. —

Advocates in domestic violence shelters and sexual assault crisis centers generally are not statutorily mandated to report child abuse and neglect. However, when such an advocate performs activities that would place him under any of the categories in subsection A of §

63.2-1509

, he would be required to report suspected child abuse or neglect. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable G. Manoli Loupassi, Member, House of Delegates, 09-097, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/5/10).

§ 63.2-105.
Confidential records and information concerning social services; child-protective services and child-placing agencies.

The local department may disclose the contents of records and information learned during the course of a child-protective services investigation or during the provision of child-protective services to a family, without a court order and without the consent of the family, to a person having a legitimate interest when in the judgment of the local department such disclosure is in the best interest of the child who is the subject of the records. Persons having a legitimate interest in child-protective services records of local departments include, but are not limited to, (i) any person who is responsible for investigating a report of known or suspected abuse or neglect or for providing services to a child or family that is the subject of a report, including multidisciplinary teams and family assessment and planning teams referenced in subsections J and K of §

63.2-1503

, law-enforcement agencies and attorneys for the Commonwealth; (ii) child welfare or human services agencies of the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions when those agencies request information to determine the compliance of any person with a child-protective services plan or an order of any court; (iii) personnel of the school or child day program as defined in §

63.2-100

attended by the child so that the local department can receive information from such personnel on an ongoing basis concerning the child’s health and behavior, and the activities of the child’s custodian; (iv) a parent, grandparent, or any other person when such parent, grandparent or other person would be considered by the local department as a potential caretaker of the child in the event the local department has to remove the child from his custodian; (v) the Commitment Review Committee and the Office of the Attorney General for the purposes of sexually violent predator civil commitments pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of Title 37.2; and (vi) the staff of (a) a court services unit, (b) the Department of Juvenile Justice, (c) a local community services board, or (d) the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services who are providing treatment, services, or care for a child who is the subject of such records for a purpose relevant to the provision of the treatment, services, or care, including the immediate identification of children who may be receiving or who have received treatment, services, or care from the local agencies and the Department of Juvenile Justice, when the local agencies have entered into a formal agreement with the Department of Juvenile Justice to provide coordinated services to such children, provided that any court services unit or local community services board to which such records are disclosed in accordance with this paragraph shall not further disclose any information received unless such further disclosure is expressly required by law.

The model memorandum of understanding developed in accordance with §

66-10.3

may serve as the formal agreement that is required pursuant to this subsection, but any formal agreement that is entered into by the local agencies and the Department of Juvenile Justice shall be reviewed by the Office of the Attorney General before such agreement may take effect.

Whenever a local department exercises its discretion to release otherwise confidential information to any person who meets one or more of these descriptions, the local department shall be presumed to have exercised its discretion in a reasonable and lawful manner.

Any person who has not been legally adopted in accordance with the provisions of this title and who was a child for whom all parental rights and responsibilities have been terminated, shall not have access to any information from a child-placing agency with respect to the identity of the biological family, except (i) upon application of the child who is 18 or more years of age, (ii) upon order of a circuit court entered upon good cause shown, and (iii) after notice to and opportunity for hearing by the applicant for such order and the child-placing agency or local board that had custody of the child.

An eligible person who is a resident of Virginia may apply for the court order provided for herein to (a) the circuit court of the county or city where the person resides or (b) the circuit court of the county or city where the principal office of the child-placing agency or local board that controls the information sought by the person is located. An eligible person who is not a resident of Virginia shall apply for such a court order to the circuit court of the county or city where the principal office of the child-placing agency or local board that controls the information sought by the person is located.

If the identity and whereabouts of the biological family are known to the agency or local board, the court may require the agency or local board to advise the biological parents of the pendency of the application for such order. In determining good cause for the disclosure of such information, the court shall consider the relative effects of such action upon the applicant for such order and upon the biological parents.

History.

2001, c. 518, § 63.1-209.1; 2002, c. 747; 2004, cc. 114, 220; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2022, cc. 63, 64.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 114 substituted “subsections J and K” for “subsection J” in clause (i) of the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A; and substituted “18” for “eighteen” in clause (i) of the first paragraph in subsection B.

The 2004 amendment by c. 220, in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “multidisciplinary” for “multi-disciplinary” and “subsections J and K” for “subsection J” in clause (i) in the last sentence; and substituted “18” for “eighteen” in clause (i) in the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, added clause (v) to the end of the first paragraph and made a related change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 63 and 64 are identical, and in subsection A, added clause (vi) in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph; and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-106.
Failure to obey subpoena or charging illegal fees; penalty.

If any person fails or refuses to obey any subpoena issued under the provisions of §

63.2-220

or §

63.2-322

, or charges or receives any fee contrary to the provisions of §

63.2-508

, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-139, 63-160, 63-203, 63-219; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-125; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Subpoena duces tecum request for forensic interview records. —

Parent was not entitled to disclosure of a forensic interview conducted with a juvenile that formed the basis of an ex parte preliminary protective order issued by a court because the disclosure was not in the child’s best interest due to the sensitive nature of the questions and answers and the need to preserve confidentiality. The parent’s argument that the issuance of a protective order prohibited the parent from possession of a firearm in violation of U.S. Const. amend. II did not outweigh the child’s best interest. Patton v. Patton, 108 Va. Cir. 175, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 126 (Culpeper County June 2, 2021).